test/tools/spellcheckers/speller-gt-norm-yamls/basespellertests_speller-gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:   ../../../tools/spellcheckers/generator-speller-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/analyser-speller-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:   ../../../tools/spellcheckers/generator-speller-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/analyser-speller-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Normativity tests: # We should not generate non-standard or irrelevant forms:
    ærrodit+Area/NO+V+TV+ImprtII+ConNeg+Sg2:                     "errod>u"
    ærrodit+Area/SE+V+TV+ImprtII+ConNeg+Sg2:                     "errod>u"
    gievádit+Area/NO+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3:                           "gievát>"
    gievádit+Area/SE+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3:                           "gievát>"
    loapptet+Area/NO+V+TV+Pot+Sg1:                               "låpti>tjav"
    loapptet+Area/SE+V+TV+Pot+Sg1:                               "låpti>tjav"
    ævtodit+Area/NO+V+TV+Der1+Der/alla+Area/NO+V+Imprt+Du2:      "evtud»alle>"
    ævtodit+Area/SE+V+TV+Der1+Der/alla+Area/SE+V+Imprt+Du2:      "evtud»alle>"
    hg+Area/NO+N+Sem/Measr+ABBR:                                 "hg"
    hg+Area/SE+N+Sem/Measr+ABBR:                                 "hg"
    DVD+v2+Area/NO+N+Sem/Obj-el+ACR+Sg+Nom:                         "dvd>"
    DVD+v2+Area/SE+N+Sem/Obj-el+ACR+Sg+Nom:                         "dvd>"
    jv+Area/NO+Adv+ABBR+Gram/IAbbr:                             ["jv", "jv."]
    jv+Area/SE+Adv+ABBR+Gram/IAbbr:                             ["jv", "jv."]
    ukeslij+Area/NO+Po:                                          "ukeslij>"
    ukeslij+Area/SE+Po:                                          "ukeslij>"
    jerrat+Area/NO+A+Attr+CmpN/SgG+Der5+Der/vuota+Area/NO+N+Ess: "jierris>#»vuohta>n"
    jerrat+Area/SE+A+Attr+CmpN/SgG+Der5+Der/vuota+Area/SE+N+Ess: "jierris>#»vuohta>n"
    nasjåvnålasj+Area/NO+A+CmpNP/Last+Sg+Nom:                    "nasjåvnålasj>"
    nasjåvnålasj+Area/SE+A+CmpNP/Last+Sg+Nom:                    "nasjåvnålasj>"
    tæksta-tv+Area/NO+N+ACR+Sg+Ela:                              "tæksta-tv>:as"
    tæksta-tv+Area/SE+N+ACR+Sg+Ela:                              "täksta-tv>:as"
